Utah statutes.
77-38-303.   Profit from sale of memorabilia -- Deposit in Crime Victim
Reparation Fund -- Penalty.
(1)  Any person who receives a profit from the sale or transfer of memorabilia
shall remit to the fund:
(a)  a complete, itemized accounting of the transaction, including:
(i)  a description of each item sold;
(ii)  the amount received for each item;
(iii)  the estimated fair market value of each item; and
(iv)  the name and address of the purchaser of each item; and
(b)  a check or money order for the amount of the profit, which shall be the
difference between the amount received for the item and the estimated fair
market value of the item.
(2)  Any person who willfully violates Subsection (1) may be assessed a civil
penalty of up to $1,000 per item sold or transferred or three times the amount
of the unremitted profit, whichever is greater.
